Utah statutes.
30-4a-1.   Authority of court.

A court having jurisdiction may, upon its finding of good cause and giving of such notice as may be ordered, enter an order nunc pro tunc in a matter relating to marriage, divorce, legal separation or annulment of marriage.



Enacted by Chapter 118, 1983 General Session

